Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska62-305
Tuition notes or contracts of business colleges; when void.

Any note or contract taken by any business college, or the business or commercial department of any other school, or by their agents or representatives, for tuition or scholarships, without first having complied with all the provisions of section 62-303, shall be void.

Laws 1915, c. 220, § 3, p. 490;

C.S.1922, § 4809;

C.S.1929, § 62-1710;

R.S.1943, § 62-305.

Foreign corporation obtaining contract for course of instruction without complying with statutes of Nebraska cannot enforce note under principle of comity. Refrigeration & Air Conditioning Institute, Inc. v. Hilyard, 146 Neb. 42, 18 N.W.2d 548 (1945).